New Jersey, session 222, A1801.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.1968, c.230 (C.9:17A-4) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  (1) The consent to the provision of medical or surgical care or services or a forensic sexual assault examination by a hospital or public clinic, or consent to the performance of medical or surgical care or services or a forensic sexual assault examination by a health care professional, when executed by a minor who is or believes that he or she may have a sexually transmitted infection, or who is at least 13 years of age and is or believes that he or she may be infected with the human immunodeficiency virus or have acquired immune deficiency syndrome, or by a minor who, in the judgment of the treating health care professional, appears to have been sexually assaulted, shall be valid and binding as if the minor had achieved the age of majority. Any such consent shall not be subject to later disaffirmance by reason of minority.  In the case of a minor who appears to have been sexually assaulted, the minor's parents or guardian shall be notified immediately, unless the treating healthcare professional believes that it is in the best interests of the patient not to do so.  Inability of the treating health care professional, hospital, or clinic to locate or notify the parents or guardian shall not preclude the provision of any emergency or medical or surgical care to the minor or the performance of a forensic sexual assault examination on the minor. (2) As used in this subsection, "health care professional" means a physician, physician assistant, nurse, or other health care professional whose professional practice is regulated pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes. b.  When a minor believes that he or she is adversely affected by a substance use disorder involving drugs or is a person with a substance use disorder involving drugs as defined in section 2 of P.L.1970, c.226 (C.24:21-2) or is adversely affected by an alcohol use disorder or is a person with an alcohol use disorder as defined in section 2 of P.L.1975, c.305 (C.26:2B-8), the minor's consent to treatment under the supervision of a physician licensed to practice medicine, or an individual licensed or certified to provide treatment for an alcohol use disorder, or in a facility licensed by the State to provide for the treatment of an alcohol use disorder, shall be valid and binding as if the minor had achieved the age of majority.  Any such consent shall not be subject to later disaffirmance by reason of minority.  Treatment for an alcohol use disorder or a substance use disorder involving drugs that is consented to by a minor shall be considered confidential information between the physician, the treatment provider, or the treatment facility, as appropriate, and the patient, and neither the minor nor the minor's physician, treatment provider, or treatment facility, as appropriate, shall be required to report such treatment when it is the result of voluntary consent, except as may otherwise be required by law. When a minor who is [sixteen] 14 years of age or older believes that he or she is in need of behavioral health care services for the treatment of mental illness or emotional disorders, the minor's consent to temporary outpatient treatment, excluding the use or administration of medication, under the supervision of a physician licensed to practice medicine, an advanced practice nurse, or an individual licensed to provide professional counseling under Title 45 of the Revised Statutes, including, but not limited to, a psychiatrist, licensed practicing psychologist, certified social worker, licensed clinical social worker, licensed social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, certified psychoanalyst, or licensed psychologist, or in an outpatient health care facility licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.), shall be valid and binding as if the minor had achieved the age of majority.  Any such consent shall not be subject to later disaffirmance by reason of minority. Treatment for behavioral health care services for mental illness or emotional disorders that is consented to by a minor shall be considered confidential information between the physician, the individual licensed to provide professional counseling, the advanced practice nurse, or the health care facility, as appropriate, and the patient, and neither the minor nor the minor's physician, professional counselor, nurse, or outpatient health care facility, as appropriate, shall be required to report such treatment when it is the result of voluntary consent. The consent of no other person or persons, including but not limited to, a spouse, parent, custodian, or guardian, shall be necessary in order to authorize a minor to receive such hospital services, facility, or clinical care or services, medical or surgical care or services, or counseling services from a physician licensed to practice medicine, an individual licensed or certified to provide treatment for an alcohol use disorder, an advanced practice nurse, or an individual licensed to provide professional counseling under Title 45 of the Revised Statutes, as appropriate, except that behavioral health care services for the treatment of mental illness or emotional disorders shall be limited to temporary outpatient services only. (cf: P.L.2017, c.131, s.7) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, a minor, 16 years of age or older, who believes that he or she is in need of behavioral health care services can consent to temporary outpatient treatment under the supervision of a licensed health care professional, excluding the use or administration of medication, as if the minor had achieved the age of majority.  This bill lowers the age at which a minor can consent to such treatment from 16 years of age or older to 14 years of age or older. Suicide is the third leading cause of death among New Jersey teens.  Between 2016 and 2018, the number of suicide deaths among persons ages of ten and 24 in New Jersey was 291. During the early stages of the coronavirus disease (COVID-19) pandemic, adolescents accounted for a higher proportion of suicides in the United States than in the years prior to the pandemic and the subsequent lockdown.  Five states, including New Jersey, had an increase in the absolute count of adolescent suicides during the pandemic.  These states also had an increase in the proportion of overall suicides among adolescents. Twenty-four states, the District of Columbia, and Puerto Rico have enacted laws allowing minors to consent to some type of behavioral or mental health treatment, and ten states allow minors between the ages of 12 and 15 to consent to such treatment. It is the sponsors intent to address the issue of, and facilitate efforts to prevent, teen suicide by lowering the age at which a minor, who believes that he or she is in need of behavioral health treatment services, can consent to such services.